California statutes. Water Code
(b) The amount of water made available by land fallowing may not exceed 20 percent of the water that would have been applied or stored by the water supplier in the absence of any contract entered into pursuant to this article in any given hydrological year, unless the agency approves, following reasonable notice and a public hearing, a larger percentage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 188.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1745.06.

A water supplier may transfer water pursuant to Section 1745.04 whether or not the water proposed to be transferred is surplus to the needs within the service area of the water supplier.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 481, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1745.07.

No transfer of water pursuant to this article or any other provision of law shall cause a forfeiture, diminution, or impairment of any water rights. A transfer that is approved pursuant to this article or any other provision of law is deemed to be a beneficial use by the transferor under this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 481, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1745.08.

This article is in addition to, and not a limitation on, the authority of any public agency under any other provision of law, including, but not limited to, Article 1 (commencing with Section 1725).

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 481, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1745.09.

Nothing in this article does any of the following:

(a) Creates in any person a right to require any water supplier to enter into a contract providing for the reduction or elimination of water use or for the transfer of water.

(b) Creates in any person reducing water use any interest in the water rights of the water supplier.

(c) Limits or otherwise affects the jurisdiction of any regulatory public agency over water transfers.

(d) Makes any change in existing water rights.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 481, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1745.10.

A water user that transfers surface water pursuant to this article may not replace that water with groundwater unless the groundwater use is either of the following:

(a) Consistent with a groundwater management plan adopted pursuant to state law for the affected area.

(b) Approved by the water supplier from whose service area the water is to be transferred and that water supplier, if a groundwater management plan has not been adopted, determines that the transfer will not create, or contribute to, conditions of long-term overdraft in the affected groundwater basin.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 481, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1745.11.

Nothing in this article prohibits the transfer of previously recharged groundwater from an overdrafted groundwater basin or the replacement of transferred surface water with groundwater previously recharged into an overdrafted groundwater basin, if the recharge was part of a groundwater banking operation carried out by direct recharge, by delivery of surface water in lieu of groundwater pumping, or by other means, for storage and extraction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Joint Use and Development [1750. - 1815.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1750. - 1752.]

1750.

As used in this chapter “works” includes dams, tunnels, diversion works, ditches, and other works or constructions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1751.

As used in this chapter “power” includes electricity, electrical power, and other power.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.

The board shall determine the pro rata and other costs provided for in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Joint Occupancy and Use [1775. - 1782.]

1775.

If at any time it appears to the board, after a hearing of the persons interested and an investigation, that the full capacity of the works built or constructed, or being built or constructed, under an appropriation of water made pursuant to the Water Commission Act or this code has not developed or cannot develop the full capacity of the stream at the point where the works have been or are being built or constructed, and that the holder of the appropriation will not or cannot, within a period deemed to be reasonable by the board, develop the stream at that point to such capacity as the board deems to be required by the public good, the board may permit the joint occupancy and use, with the holder of the appropriation, to the extent necessary to develop the stream to its full capacity or to such portion of its capacity as may appear to the board to be advisable, by any persons applying therefor, of any such works.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1776.

The board shall take into consideration the reasonable cost of the original and new work, the good faith of the applicant, the market for water or power to be supplied by the original and the new work, and the income or use that may be required to provide fair and reasonable returns upon such cost.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1777.

The applicant shall be required to pay to the person owning the works a pro rata portion of the total cost of the old and the new works.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1778.

If the water is used or to be used for irrigation or domestic purposes, the pro rata portion of the cost shall be based upon the proportion of the water used by the original and the subsequent users of the works.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1779.

If the water is used or to be used for the generation of power, the pro rata portion of the cost shall be based upon the relative amount of power capable of being developed by the original and the new works.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1780.

If a portion of the water is used or to be used for irrigation and another portion is used or to be used for the generation of power, the applicant shall pay to the person owning the works a pro rata portion of the total cost of the old and new works based upon the proportion of the relative amount of water used by each joint occupant and the income derived by each from the joint occupancy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1781.

If any of the water is used or to be used for purposes other than those specified in this article, the applicant shall pay to the person owning the works such a pro rata portion of the total cost of the old and new works as appears to the board to be just and equitable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1782.

The applicant shall also pay a proper pro rata share, based as above provided in this article, of the cost of maintaining the works, on and after beginning the occupancy and use thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Enlargement of Existing Works of Another [1800. - 1801.]

1800.

If it appears to the board that the full capacity of the works built or constructed, or being built or constructed, under an appropriation of water under the Water Commission Act or this code, will not develop the full capacity of the stream at that point, and that the public good requires it, and the board specifically so finds after investigation and hearing of the persons interested, the board may permit any person to repair, improve, add to, supplement, or enlarge, at his own expense, any works already so built or constructed or in process of being so built or constructed under the provisions of this division, and to use the works jointly with the owners thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1801.

The repairing, improving, adding to, supplementing, or enlarging of works under this article, shall not materially interfere with the proper use thereof by the owner of the works nor materially injure the works.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Joint Use of Capacity in Water Conveyance Facilities [1810. - 1815.]

1810.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, neither the state, nor any regional or local public agency may deny a bona fide transferor of water the use of a water conveyance facility which has unused capacity, for the period of time for which that capacity is available, if fair compensation is paid for that use, subject to the following:

(a) Any person or public agency that has a long-term water service contract with or the right to receive water from the owner of the conveyance facility shall have the right to use any unused capacity prior to any bona fide transferor.

(b) The commingling of transferred water does not result in a diminution of the beneficial uses or quality of the water in the facility, except that the transferor may, at the transferor’s own expense, provide for treatment to prevent the diminution, and the transferred water is of substantially the same quality as the water in the facility.

(c) Any person or public agency that has a water service contract with or the right to receive water from the owner of the conveyance facility who has an emergency need may utilize the unused capacity that was made available pursuant to this section for the duration of the emergency.

(d) This use of a water conveyance facility is to be made without injuring any legal user of water and without unreasonably affecting fish, wildlife, or other instream beneficial uses and without unreasonably affecting the overall economy or the environment of the county from which the water is being transferred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 918, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1811.

As used in this article, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Bona fide transferor” means a person or public agency as defined in Section 20009 of the Government Code with a contract for sale of water that may be conditioned upon the acquisition of conveyance facility capacity to convey the water that is the subject of the contract.

(b) “Emergency” means a sudden occurrence such as a storm, flood, fire, or an unexpected equipment outage impairing the ability of a person or public agency to make water deliveries.

(c) “Fair compensation” means the reasonable charges incurred by the owner of the conveyance system, including capital, operation, maintenance, and replacement costs, increased costs from any necessitated purchase of supplemental power, and including reasonable credit for any offsetting benefits for the use of the conveyance system.

(d) “Replacement costs” mean the reasonable portion of costs associated with material acquisition for the correction of irreparable wear or other deterioration of conveyance facility parts that have an anticipated life that is less than the conveyance facility repayment period and which costs are attributable to the proposed use.

(e) “Unused capacity” means space that is available within the operational limits of the conveyance system and that the owner is not using during the period for which the transfer is proposed and which space is sufficient to convey the quantity of water proposed to be transferred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 485, Sec. 161.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.

The state, regional, or local public agency owning the water conveyance facility shall in a timely manner determine the following:

(a) The amount and availability of unused capacity.

(b) The terms and conditions, including operation and maintenance requirements and scheduling, quality requirements, term or use, priorities, and fair compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 918, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1813.

In making the determinations required by this article, the respective public agency shall act in a reasonable manner consistent with the requirements of law to facilitate the voluntary sale, lease, or exchange of water and shall support its determinations by written findings. In any judicial action challenging any determination made under this article the court shall consider all relevant evidence, and the court shall give due consideration to the purposes and policies of this article. In any such case the court shall sustain the determination of the public agency if it finds that the determination is supported by substantial evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 918, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1814.

This article shall apply to only 70 percent of the unused capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 918, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1815.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 1810, a transferor of water shall not use a water conveyance facility that has unused capacity to transfer water from a groundwater basin underlying desert lands that is in the vicinity of a national monument, a national preserve, a national park, a state or federal wilderness area, or state lands to outside of the groundwater basin unless the State Lands Commission, in consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife and the department, finds, upon receipt of an application pursuant to subdivision (b),
 that the transfer of the water will not adversely affect the natural or cultural resources, including groundwater resources or habitat, of those federal or state lands.

(b) (1) Before using a water conveyance facility that has unused capacity to transfer water from a groundwater basin underlying desert lands, a transferor of water shall submit an application to the State Lands Commission for review of the proposed transfer. The application shall include, at a minimum, both of the following:

(A) The names of the transferor and the owner of the water conveyance facility.

(B) Data and reports pertinent to making the finding
 described in this section.

(2) (A) The State Lands Commission shall review an application submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) and, within 15 months of receipt of the application and in consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife and the department, shall make a written finding, available to the public, on whether the proposed transfer will not adversely affect the natural or cultural resources, including groundwater resources or habitat, of the federal or state lands described in subdivision (a).

(B) If the State Lands Commission, in consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife and the department, determines that it cannot make a finding pursuant to subparagraph (A) within 15 months, the commission may extend the date by which the commission is required to make the finding to no later than 24 months from the date of
 receipt of the application. If it determines an extension pursuant to this subparagraph is needed, the commission shall make its justifications for the extension and an approximate timeline for the duration of the extension available to the public.

(c) In making the finding described in this section, the State Lands Commission shall review all available scientific information, including peer-reviewed and published studies, in consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife and the department.

(d) If the State Lands Commission finds that a proposed transfer of water underlying desert lands will not adversely affect the natural or cultural resources of state or federal lands, the commission shall require the transferor of water to report, on an annual basis, to the commission information, as the commission may define, on the condition of the groundwater
 basin. 

(e) For purposes of this section, “desert lands” means the portion of California located within the following area:

Beginning at Interstate 15 and the intersection of the range line between Ranges 5 and 6 East, Township 11 North, San Bernardino Baseline and Meridian, southerly along those range lines to the intersection with Interstate 40 in Township 8 North, San Bernardino Baseline and Meridian;

Thence easterly along Interstate 40 to the intersection of Interstate 40 and the range
 lines between Ranges 12 and 13 East, Township 7 North, San Bernardino Baseline and Meridian;

Thence southerly along the range lines between Ranges 12 and 13 East to the intersection with State Highway Route 62 in Township 1 South, San Bernardino Baseline and Meridian;

Thence easterly along State Highway Route 62 to the intersection with United States Highway 95;

Thence northerly along United States Highway 95 to the California-Nevada boundary;

Thence northerly along the California-Nevada boundary to Interstate 15;

Thence westerly along Interstate 15 to the point of beginning.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 169, Sec. 2.   (SB 307)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Enforcement of Water Rights [1825. - 1851.]



  ARTICLE 1. Policy [1825. - 1825.]

1825.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the state take vigorous action to enforce the terms and conditions of permits, licenses, certifications, and registrations to appropriate water, to enforce state board orders and decisions, and to prevent the unlawful diversion of water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 215.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Cease and Desist Orders [1831. - 1836.]

1831.

(a) When the board determines that any person is violating, or threatening to violate, any requirement described in subdivision (d), the board may issue an order to that person to cease and desist from that violation.

(b) The cease and desist order shall require that person to comply forthwith or in accordance with a time schedule set by the board.

(c) The board may issue a cease and desist order only after notice and an opportunity for hearing pursuant to Section 1834.

(d) The board may issue a cease and desist order in response to a violation or threatened violation of any of the following:

(1) The prohibition set forth in Section 1052 against the unauthorized diversion or use of water subject to this division.

(2) Any term or condition of a permit, license, certification, or registration issued under this division.

(3) Any decision or order of the board issued under this part, Section 275, Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 10735) of Part 2.74 of Division 6, or Article 7 (commencing with Section 13550) of Chapter 7 of Division 7, in which decision or order the person to whom the cease and desist order will be issued, or a predecessor in interest to that person, was named as a party directly affected by the decision or order.

(4) A regulation adopted by the board.

(5) Any
 extraction restriction, limitation, order, or regulation adopted or issued under Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 10735) of Part 2.74 of Division 6.

(6) Any diversion or use of water for cannabis cultivation if any of paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, or any of the following applies:

(A) A license is required, but has not been obtained, under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 26060) of, or Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 26070) of, Division 10 of the Business and Professions Code.

(B) The diversion is not in compliance with an applicable limitation or requirement established by the board or the Department of Fish and Wildlife under Section 13149.

(C) The diversion or use is not in compliance with a requirement imposed under paragraphs (1) and (2)
 of subdivision (b) of Section 26060.1 of, and paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 26070 of, the Business and Professions Code.

(7) A condition or reporting requirement for the diversion of floodwaters for groundwater recharge under Section 1242.1.

(e) This article does not alter the regulatory authority of the board under other provisions of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 28.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1832.

Cease and desist orders of the board shall be effective upon the issuance thereof. The board may, after notice and opportunity for hearing, upon its own motion or upon receipt of an application from an aggrieved person, modify, revoke, or stay in whole or in part any cease and desist order issued pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 652, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1834.

(a) In the event that a violation of a requirement described in subdivision (d) of Section 1831 is occurring or threatening to occur, the board shall give notice by personal notice, certified mail, in accordance with the manner of service of a summons under Article 3 (commencing with Section 415.10) of, and Article 4 (commencing with Section 416.10) of, Chapter 4 of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or by any method of physical delivery that provides a receipt pursuant to which the party shall be informed that they may request a hearing not later than 20 days from the date on which the notice is received. The notice shall contain a statement of facts and information that would tend to show the proscribed action, and notification of the requirements of subdivision (b). For
 purposes of this subdivision, “physical delivery that provides a receipt” includes physical delivery methods that provide electronic confirmation of delivery to the intended address.

(b) Unless a written request for a hearing signed by or on behalf of the notified party is delivered to or received by mail by the board within 20 days after receipt of the notice, the board may adopt a cease and desist order, based on the statement of facts and information set forth in the notice, without a hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 158, Sec. 4.   (SB 756)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1835.

As used in this chapter, “person” includes any city, county, district, the state, or any department or agency thereof, and the United States to the extent authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 933, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

1836.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the board from issuing any order or taking any other action authorized pursuant to Sections 275 and 1052.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 933, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Monitoring and Reporting [1840. - 1841.5.]

1840.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a person who, on or after January 1, 2016, diverts 10 acre-feet of water per year or more under a permit or license shall install and maintain a device or employ a method capable of measuring the rate of direct diversion, rate of collection to storage, and rate of withdrawal or release from storage. The measurements shall be made using the best available technologies and best professional practices, as defined in Section 5100, using a device or methods satisfactory to the board, as follows:

(A) A device shall be capable of continuous monitoring of the rate and quantity of water diverted and shall be properly maintained. The permittee or licensee shall
 provide the board with evidence that the device has been installed with the first report submitted after installation of the device. The permittee or licensee shall provide the board with evidence demonstrating that the device is functioning properly as part of the reports submitted at five-year intervals after the report documenting installation of the device, or upon request of the board.

(B) In developing regulations pursuant to Section 1841, the board shall consider devices and methods that provide accurate measurement of the total amount diverted and the rate of diversion. The board shall consider devices and methods that provide accurate measurements within an acceptable range of error, including the following:

(i) Electricity records dedicated to a pump and recent pump test.

(ii) Staff gage calibrated with an
 acceptable streamflow rating curve.

(iii) Staff gage calibrated for a flume or weir.

(iv) Staff gage calibrated with an acceptable storage capacity curve.

(v) Pressure transducer and acceptable storage capacity curve.

(2) The permittee or licensee shall maintain a record of all diversion monitoring that includes the date, time, and diversion rate at time intervals of one hour or less, and the total amount of water diverted. These records shall be included with reports submitted under the permit or license, as required under subdivision (c), or upon request of the board.

(b) (1) The board may modify the requirements of subdivision (a) upon finding either of the
 following:

(A) That strict compliance is infeasible, is unreasonably expensive, would unreasonably affect public trust uses, or would result in the waste or unreasonable use of water.

(B) That the need for monitoring and reporting is adequately addressed by other conditions of the permit or license.

(2) The board may increase the 10-acre-foot reporting threshold of subdivision (a) in a watershed or subwatershed, after considering the diversion reporting threshold in relation to quantity of water within the watershed or subwatershed. The board may increase the 10-acre-foot reporting threshold to 25 acre-feet or above if it finds that the benefits of the additional information within the watershed or subwatershed are substantially outweighed by the cost of installing measuring devices or employing methods for
 measurement for diversions at the 10-acre-foot threshold.

(c) At least annually, a person who diverts water under a registration, permit, or license shall report to the board the following information:

(1) The quantity of water diverted by month.

(2) The maximum rate of diversion by months in the preceding calendar year.

(3) The information required by subdivision (a), if applicable.

(4) The amount of water used, if any, for cannabis cultivation.

(d) Compliance with the applicable requirements of this section is a condition of every registration, permit, or license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 32, Sec. 98.   (SB 837)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1841.

(a) The board may adopt regulations requiring measurement and reporting of water diversion and use by either of the following:

(1) Persons authorized to appropriate water under a permit, license, registration for small domestic, small irrigation, or livestock stockpond use, or certification for livestock stockpond use.

(2) Persons required to comply with measurement and reporting regulations pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 5103.

(b) The initial regulations that the board adopts pursuant to this section shall be adopted as emergency
 regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The adoption of the initial regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, any emergency regulations adopted under this section shall remain in effect until revised by the board.

(c) The adoption of the initial regulations pursuant to this article is exempt from Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 27, Sec. 15.   (SB 88)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1841.5.

(a) For the purposes of a device installed pursuant to Section 1840 or 1841 or a method of measurement proposed and adopted pursuant to Section 934 or 935 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations, any diverter who has completed an instructional course regarding the devices or measurement method included in the course administered by the University of California Cooperative Extension, including passage of a proficiency test before the completion of the course, shall be considered a qualified individual when installing and maintaining devices or implementing methods of measurement that were taught in the course for the diverter’s diversion. The proficiency test shall seek to certify that the diverter has a satisfactory understanding of the principles of measurement and the use of a measurement method included in the
 course or the installation of a device. The University of California Cooperative Extension and the board shall develop the curriculum of the course and the proficiency test. The University of California Cooperative Extension and the board shall ensure the course curriculum and the proficiency test do not conflict with any state licensing acts.

(b) For purposes of this section, “diverter” means an individual authorized to divert water under a valid water right, a lessee of property that is subject to a water right who is acting as a representative of the water right holder, or a bona fide employee of the water right holder or lessee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 221, Sec. 1.   (SB 880)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Enforcement [1845. - 1848.]

1845.

(a) Upon the failure of any person to comply with a cease and desist order issued by the board pursuant to this chapter, the Attorney General, upon the request of the board, shall petition the superior court for the issuance of prohibitory or mandatory injunctive relief as appropriate, including a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction.

(b) (1) A person or entity who violates a cease and desist order issued pursuant to this chapter may be liable in an amount not to exceed the following:

(A) If the violation occurs in a critically dry year immediately preceded by two
 or more consecutive below normal, dry, or critically dry years or during a period for which the Governor has issued a proclamation of a state of emergency under the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code) based on drought conditions, ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each day in which the violation occurs.

(B) If the violation is not described by subparagraph (A), two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each day in which the violation occurs.

(2) Civil liability may be imposed by the superior court. The Attorney General, upon the request of the board, shall petition the superior court to impose, assess, and recover those sums.

(3) Civil liability may be imposed administratively by the board pursuant to Section 1055.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 342, Sec. 2.   (AB 460)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1846.

(a) A person or entity may be liable for a violation of any of the following in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day in which the violation occurs:

(1) A term or condition of a permit, license, certificate, or registration issued under this division.

(2) A regulation or order adopted by the board.

(3) A condition or reporting requirement for the diversion of floodwaters for groundwater recharge under Section 1242.1.

(b) For a violation described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) that
 constitutes the diversion of water contrary to a curtailment order adopted by the board, a person or entity may be liable in an amount not to exceed the following:

(1) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each day in which the violation occurs.

(2) Two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each acre-foot of water diverted in violation of the curtailment order, beginning on the first day on which the violation occurs.

(c) Civil liability may be imposed by the superior court. The Attorney General, upon the request of the board, shall petition the superior court to impose, assess, and recover those sums.

(d) Civil liability may be imposed administratively by
 the board pursuant to Section 1055.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 342, Sec. 3.   (AB 460)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1846.5.

(a) An urban retail water supplier who commits any of the violations identified in subdivision (b) may be liable in an amount not to exceed the following, as applicable:

(1) If the violation occurs in a critically dry year immediately preceded by two or more consecutive below normal, dry, or critically dry years or during a period for which the Governor has issued a proclamation of a state of emergency under the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section
 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code) based on drought conditions, ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each day in which the violation occurs.

(2) For all violations other than those described in paragraph (1), one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day in which the violation occurs.

(b) Liability pursuant to this section may be imposed for any of the following violations:

(1) Violation of an order issued under Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10609) of Part 2.55 of Division 6.

(2) Violation of a regulation issued under Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10609) of Part 2.55 of Division 6, if the violation occurs after
 November 1, 2027.

(c) Civil liability may be imposed by the superior court. The Attorney General, upon the request of the board, shall petition the superior court to impose, assess, and recover those sums.

(d) Civil liability may be imposed administratively by the board
 pursuant to Section 1055.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 3.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1847.

(a) A person or entity may be liable for a violation of any of the requirements of subdivision (b) in an amount not to exceed the sum of the following:

(1) Five hundred dollars ($500), plus two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each additional day on which the violation continues if the person fails to correct the violation within 30 days after the board has called the violation to the attention of that person.

(2) Two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each acre-foot of water diverted or used in violation of the applicable requirement.

(b) Liability may be imposed for any of the following violations:

(1) Violation of a principle, guideline, or requirement established by the board or the Department of Fish and Wildlife under Section 13149.

(2) Failure to submit information, or making a material misstatement in information submitted, under Section 26060.1 of the Business and Professions Code.

(3) Violation of any requirement imposed under subdivision (b) of Section 26060.1 of the Business and Professions Code.

(4) Diversion or use of water for cannabis cultivation for which a license is required, but has not been obtained, under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 26060) or Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 26070) of Division 10 of the Business and Professions Code.

(c) Civil liability may
 be imposed by the superior court. The Attorney General, upon the request of the board, shall petition the superior court to impose, assess, and recover those sums.

(d) Civil liability may be imposed administratively by the board pursuant to Section 1055.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 176.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1848.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), remedies under this chapter are in addition to, and do not supersede or limit, any other remedy, civil or criminal.

(b) Civil liability shall not be imposed both administratively and by the superior court for the same violation.

(c) No liability shall be recoverable under Section 1846 or 1847 for a violation for which liability is recovered under Section 1052.

(d) In determining the appropriate amount, the court, or the board, as the case may be, shall take into consideration all relevant circumstances, including, but not
 limited to, the extent of harm caused by the violation, the nature and persistence of the violation, the length of time over which the violation occurs, and the corrective action, if any, taken by the violator.

(e) All funds recovered pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the Water Rights Fund established pursuant to Section 1550.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 32, Sec. 102.   (SB 837)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Private Litigation [1850. - 1851.]

1850.

Any factual or legal determinations made pursuant to a cease and desist order shall be conclusive and shall preclude any party to the order from raising those issues in any subsequent administrative proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 652, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1851.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit or abridge the right of any person to bring an action for equitable or legal relief for harm caused by an unauthorized diversion or a violation of a term or condition of a permit or license. No such person shall be required to exhaust any administrative remedy provided by this chapter before bringing such an action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 933, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. DETERMINATION OF WATER RIGHTS [2000. - 2900.]



  CHAPTER 1. Reference by Courts of This State [2000. - 2048.]



  ARTICLE 1. Subjects of Reference [2000. - 2001.]

2000.

In any suit brought in any court of competent jurisdiction in this State for determination of rights to water, the court may order a reference to the board, as referee, of any or all issues involved in the suit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2001.

In any suit brought in any court of competent jurisdiction in this State for determination of rights to water, the court may refer the suit to the board for investigation of and report upon any or all of the physical facts involved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Report of Referee [2010. - 2021.]

2010.

The board may base its report solely upon its own investigations or in addition thereto may hold hearings and take testimony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2011.

The report of the board as referee may contain such opinion upon the law and the facts as it deems proper in view of the issues submitted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2012.

The report shall set forth such findings of fact and conclusions of law as may be required by the court’s order of reference.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2013.
